Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201371-1939
Department; deny or refuse renewal
of license; grounds.

The department may deny or refuse to renew a license under
the Children's Residential Facilities and Placing Licensure Act to any residential
child-caring agency or child-placing agency that fails to meet the requirements
for licensure provided in the act or in rules and regulations adopted and
promulgated under the act, including:

(1) Failing an
inspection under section 71-1933;

(2) Having had a license revoked within
the two-year period preceding application; or

(3) Any of the grounds listed
in section 71-1940.

Laws 2013, LB265, § 16.